Washington statutes.
RCW 31.20.030

Corporate powers.

In furtherance of the purposes set forth in RCW 31.20.020, and in addition to the powers conferred by the general laws relating to corporations, this corporation shall, subject to the restrictions and limitations set forth in this chapter, have the following powers:

(1) To borrow money on secured or unsecured notes from any bank, trust company, savings bank, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, building and loan association, credit union, insurance company or union funds which shall be members of this corporation and to pledge bonds, notes and other securities as collateral therefor: PROVIDED, In no case shall the amount so loaned by any member exceed the limit as hereinafter defined;

(2) To lend money upon secured or unsecured applications: PROVIDED, It shall not be the purpose hereof to take from other institutions within the state any such loans or commitments as may be desired by such institutions generally in the ordinary course of their business;

(3) To establish and regulate the terms and conditions of any such loans and charges for interest or service connected therewith;

(4) To purchase, hold, lease and otherwise acquire and to convey such real estate as may, from time to time, be acquired by it in satisfaction of debts or may be acquired by it in the foreclosure of mortgages thereon or upon judgments for debts or in settlements to secure debts.

[ 1959 c 213 s 3.]